Arkansas, session 2025, HB1672.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-15-1004(c)(5), concerning licensure
exemptions that allow a teacher to teach a grade level or subject for which
he or she is not fully or provisionally licensed under the Arkansas Public
Education Act of 1997, is amended to read as follows:
(5) A licensure exception under:
(A) A District of Innovation Program, § 6-15-2801 et seq.;
(B)(A) The Arkansas Quality Charter Schools Act of 2013, §
6-23-101 et seq.; or
(C)(B) Section 6-15-103;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 15, Subchapter 28, is
repealed.
*TNL093*
04-07-2025 10:31:54 TNL093

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/7/25 HB1672
6-15-2801. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “District of innovation” means a public school district with
one (1) or more schools of innovation that has:
(A) Submitted a school of innovation application in
compliance with § 6-15-2803;
(B) Obtained necessary exceptions from laws, rules, and
local policies to improve the educational performance of students from the
Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education; and
(C) Been approved as a district of innovation by the
commissioner;
(2) “Eligible employees” means the employees who are employed at
a school that is considering being designated as a school of innovation;
(3) “Innovation” means a new or creative alternative to the
existing instructional and administrative practices that is intended to
improve academic performance and learning for all students;
(4)(A)(i) “School council of innovation” means a body of
individuals from a current or aspiring school of innovation composed of
teachers, classified employees, the building-level principal or his or her
administrative designee, parents, community members, a minimum of two (2)
students from the school of innovation, and other interested parties selected
by the school council of innovation to participate.
(ii) The teacher representatives shall be elected by
a majority vote of the school's licensed eligible employees.
(iii) The classified representatives shall be elected
by a majority vote of the school's classified eligible employees.
(iv)(a) The parent representatives shall be
selected by a majority vote of the attendees at a meeting called for the
purpose of selecting the school's parent representatives and shall have a
child in the school to be eligible to serve on the school council of
innovation.
(b) Schools with a ten percent (10%) or
greater minority student population shall have minority representation on the
school council of innovation.
(B) The school council of innovation shall:
(i) Generate innovative ideas and proposals of its
04-07-2025 10:31:54 TNL093

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/7/25 HB1672
own;
(ii) Determine a method for requesting innovative
ideas and proposals from school employees, community members, and other
stakeholders to be submitted to the school council of innovation;
(iii) Receive innovative ideas and proposals from
school employees, community members, and other stakeholders;
(iv) Consider all innovative ideas and proposals
submitted by community members and other stakeholders; and
(v) Determine the content and format of the plan
that will be voted on by the eligible employees.
(C) The school council of innovation may create
subcommittees, which may include noncouncil members, to work on developing
portions of the plan; and
(5)(A) “School of innovation” means a school that participates
in a district of innovation to transform and improve teaching and learning.
(B) A school of innovation's plan is subject to the
exceptions approved by the commissioner for the school of innovation.

6-15-2802. School of innovation designation — Rules.
(a)(1) The Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education may
approve a public school's application to become a school of innovation for
the purpose of transforming and improving the teaching and learning under §
6-15-2803.
(2) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education may
designate a public school as a school of innovation under subdivision (a)(1)
of this section if the public school has met the objectives outlined in the
public school's application to become a school of innovation within the time
period established in the public school's application.
(b)(1) A school of innovation shall be approved for a period of four
(4) years and may be renewed for four-year periods thereafter.
(2) The commissioner may revoke a public school's school of
innovation designation if the public school fails to substantially fulfill
the school of innovation plan as established in the public school's school of
innovation application, meet goals and performance targets, or comply with
applicable laws or rules.
(c) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules to administer this
04-07-2025 10:31:54 TNL093

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/7/25 HB1672
subchapter, including without limitation rules that address the:
(1) Rules subject to exemption or modification for a school of
innovation application if approved by the commissioner;
(2) Application, school of innovation plan review, approval, and
amendment process for a public school district to establish a school of
innovation;
(3) Timeline for initial approval of a school of innovation and
subsequent renewal, including any ongoing evaluations of a school of
innovation;
(4) Documentation required to show meaningful parental,
educator, and community engagement and capacity for the changes identified in
the school of innovation plan;
(5) Approval by the eligible employees of a school of
innovation;
(6) Evidence of teacher collaboration and shared leadership
responsibility within each school seeking to become a school of innovation;
(7) Documentation of the understanding and implementation of
research-based practices of professional learning communities;
(8) Process for revocation of a designation as a district of
innovation or school of innovation;
(9) Reporting and oversight responsibility of the school of
innovation and the division;
(10) Budget and financial details of the school of innovation;
and
(11) Other information necessary as determined by the state
board.

6-15-2803. School of innovation application.
(a) A school district shall submit its school of innovation
application, approved by the school district board of directors, to the
Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education for approval to become a
school of innovation.
(b) A school of innovation application shall address without
limitation:
(1) The goals and performance targets for the school of
innovation, which may include without limitation:
04-07-2025 10:31:54 TNL093

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/7/25 HB1672
(A) Reducing the achievement gap among one (1) or more
groups of students by accelerating learning experiences for academically low-
achieving students while increasing all student learning through the
implementation of highly rigorous standards for student performance;
(B) Increasing student participation in curriculum
options;
(C) Exploring new avenues for expanding students' college
and career readiness;
(D) Motivating students by exploring innovative teaching
and learning choices; and
(E) Transforming a school's culture and climate in a
manner that will lead to transformative teaching and learning;
(2) Changes needed in the school that will lead to students who
are better prepared for success in life and career; and
(3) Innovative practices to be used in the school of innovation.
(c) Schools of innovation shall document:
(1) Parental, school employee, and community engagement;
(2) The capacity for the proposed school of innovation;
(3) The rationale for law, rule, and local policy exception
requests;
(4) Progress toward goals and performance targets; and
(5) Other information requested by the commissioner.

6-15-2804. School of innovation.
(a) A school that is designated a school of innovation shall:
(1) Ensure that the same health, safety, civil rights, and
disability rights requirements are in place as those that apply to all other
public schools;
(2) Ensure that the high school curriculum offered meets or
exceeds the minimum high school graduation requirements adopted by the State
Board of Education;
(3) Adhere to financial audits, audit procedures, and audit
requirements adopted by the state board for public school districts;
(4) Require criminal background checks for school employees and
volunteers as required by law for public school districts;
(5) Comply with open records and open meeting requirements;
04-07-2025 10:31:54 TNL093

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/7/25 HB1672
(6) Comply with purchasing limitations and requirements;
(7)(A) Provide instructional time that meets or exceeds the
instructional time requirement adopted by the state board unless granted an
exception by the Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education.
(B) Instructional time may include on-site instruction,
distance or virtual learning, and work-based learning on nontraditional
school days or hours;
(8) Provide data requested by the Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education to generate reports;
(9) [Repealed.]
(10) Comply with state law and rules regarding the education of
gifted and talented students; and
(11) Demonstrate research-based implementation of professional
learning communities throughout the school that address the needs of the
students and professionals.
(b)(1) Before a public school district submits a school of innovation
plan to the commissioner, the eligible employees of each proposed school of
innovation shall vote on whether the school shall be designated a school of
innovation.
(2) A minimum of sixty percent (60%) of the eligible employees
voting in support of the school's designation as a school of innovation is
required before the school's innovation plan may be submitted to the school
district board of directors for approval.
(3) The school council of innovation shall be responsible for
conducting the vote required under subdivision (b)(1) of this section.
(c) A school of innovation plan may request exemptions from local
policies and specific laws and rules approved for exemption or modification
by the state board except The Teacher Fair Dismissal Act of 1983, § 6-17-1501
et seq. [repealed].
(d) A public school district with a negotiated employment contract in
place shall follow the procedure set forth within the contract that allows
the implementation of a school of innovation.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-17-2803(16)(B), concerning the definition
of a teacher under the Teacher Excellence and Support System, is amended to
read as follows:
04-07-2025 10:31:54 TNL093

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/7/25 HB1672
(B) “Teacher” also includes a licensed or nonlicensed
classroom teacher employed in a position under subdivision (16)(A)(ii) of
this section at a:
(i) Public charter school under a waiver of teacher
licensure requirements granted by the state board in the charter; or
(ii) School district under a waiver of teacher
licensure requirements granted by the state board under § 6-15-103 or under
the district of innovation program under § 6-15-2801 et seq.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-17-2808(a)(2)(A), concerning the
implementation and applicability of the Teacher Excellence and Support
System, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) This subchapter is not waived when a public school,
charter school, or school district obtains a waiver granted by the state
board from the laws and rules governing educator licensure:
(i) In the charter of a public charter school; or
(ii) Under § 6-15-103; or
(iii) Under the district of innovation program under
§ 6-15-2801 et seq.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 6-23-103 is amended to read as follows:
6-23-103. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Adult education charter school” means a charter school for
individuals at least nineteen (19) years of age that offers a high school
diploma program and an industry certification program simultaneously to
students;
(2) "Applicant" means an eligible entity that seeks to apply for
an open-enrollment public charter school or a conversion public charter
school by submitting an approved application with supporting documentation to
the authorizer and is eligible to conduct business in the state;
(3) “Application” means the proposal for obtaining conversion
public charter school status or open-enrollment public charter school status
charter school proposal and supporting documentation submitted to the
authorizer that seeks to establish an open-enrollment public charter school
or a conversion public charter school;
04-07-2025 10:31:54 TNL093

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/7/25 HB1672
(3)(4) “Authorizer” means an entity that authorizes a charter,
which may be either the:
(A) Division of Elementary and Secondary Education acting
through the charter authorizing panel established under § 6-23-701, with
final approval of all decisions by the State Board of Education; or
(B) State Board of Education acting under § 6-23-703;
(4)(5) “Charter” means a performance-based contract for an
initial five-year period between the authorizer and an approved applicant for
public charter school status that exempts the public charter school from
state and local rules, regulations, policies, and procedures specified in the
contract and from the provisions of this title specified in the contract
that:
(A) Serves as a governing agreement that exempts a public
charter school from specified state and local rules, regulations, policies,
and procedures as outlined in the charter;
(B) Defines the performance expectations and
accountability standards for the approved public charter school;
(C) Is governed by Arkansas law; and
(D) Establishes the terms and conditions between the
authorizer and:
(i) An open-enrollment public charter school board;
or
(ii) The local school district board of directors of
a conversion public charter school;
(6) "Charter authorizing panel" means the seven (7) member panel
appointed by the Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education that is
established and administered by the division to take actions authorized under
§ 6-23-701;
(7) "Charter school board" means the governing body of an open-
enrollment public charter school that:
(A) Is a non-profit entity; and
(B) Satisfies the relevant requirements of a tax-exempt
organization under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986;
(5)(8)(A) “Conversion public charter school” means a public
school that:
(i) That has converted to operating under the terms
04-07-2025 10:31:54 TNL093

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/7/25 HB1672
of a charter approved by the a local school district board of directors and
the authorizer; or
(ii)(a) Previously designated as a school of
innovation under the former District of Innovation Program, §§ 6-15-2801 et
seq.
(b) A school previously designated as a school
of innovation specified under subdivision (8)(A)(ii)(a) of this section shall
retain all waivers in effect for the school as of July 1, 2025, until the end
of the four-year approval cycle in effect as of July 1, 2025.
(c) A conversion public charter school under
subdivision (8)(A)(ii)(a) of this section may be renewed by the authorizer in
accordance with § 6-23-201 et seq.
(B)(i) A conversion public charter school that existed on
or before July 1, 2025, shall retain all waivers in effect for the conversion
public charter school unless:
(a)(1) The conversion public charter school
received a letter grade of "D" or "F" under the school rating system under §
6-15-2101 et seq. for the 2022-2023 school year.
(2) All waivers of a conversion public
charter school under subdivision (8)(B)(i)(a)(1) of this section shall be in
effect until the end of the 2026-2027 school year;
(b)(1) The conversion public charter school
received a letter grade of "C" under the school rating system under § 6-15-
2101 et seq. for the 2022-2023 school year.
(2) All waivers of a conversion public
charter school under subdivision (8)(B)(i)(b)(1) of this section shall be in
effect until the end of the 2026-2027 school year; or
(c)(1) The conversion public charter school
received a letter grade of "A" or "B" under the school rating system under §
6-15-2101 et seq. for the 2022-2023 school year.
(2) All waivers of a conversion public
charter school under subdivision (8)(B)(i)(c)(1) of this section shall be in
effect until the end of the 2027-2028 school year.
(ii) If no conditions under subdivision (8)(B)(i) of
this section exist, then the waivers in effect for a conversion public
charter school that existed on or before July 1, 2025, shall be retained
04-07-2025 10:31:54 TNL093

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/7/25 HB1672
until the end of the charter term in effect as of July 1, 2025;
(6)(9) “Eligible entity” means:
(A) A public institution of higher education;
(B) A private, nonsectarian institution of higher
education;
(C) A governmental entity; or
(D) An organization that:
(i) Is nonsectarian in its program, admissions
policies, employment practices, and operations; and
(ii) Has applied for tax-exempt status under the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3);
(7)(10) “Founding member” means any an individual who is either:
(A) A member or an employee of the an eligible entity
applying for the initial charter for an open-enrollment public charter
school; or
(B) A member of the initial governing nonadvisory board of
the an open-enrollment public charter school;
(8)(11) “Local school board” means a board of directors
exercising the control and management of a public school district;
(9)(A)(12)(A) “Open-enrollment public charter school” means a
public school that:
(i) Is operating under the terms of a charter
granted by the authorizer on the application of an eligible entity;
(ii) May draw its students from any public school
district in this state; and
(iii) Is a local educational agency under the
Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965, 20 U.S.C. § 6301 et seq., as
it existed on April 10, 2009.
(B) “Open-enrollment public charter school” also possesses
the same meaning as given the term “charter school” in the Elementary and
Secondary Education Act of 1965, 20 U.S.C. § 7221i, as it existed on April
10, 2009.
(C) An open-enrollment public charter school that existed
on or before July 1, 2025, shall retain all waivers in effect for the open-
enrollment public charter school unless the open-enrollment public charter
school received:
04-07-2025 10:31:54 TNL093

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/7/25 HB1672
(i)(a) A letter grade of "D" or "F" under the school
rating system under § 6-15-2101 et seq. for the 2022-2023 school year.
(b) All waivers of an open-enrollment public
charter school under subdivision (12)(C)(i)(a) of this section shall be in
effect until the end of the 2026-2027 school year or the end of the charter
term, whichever occurs first;
(ii)(a) Received a letter grade of "C" under the
school rating system under § 6-15-2101 et seq. for the 2022-2023 school year.
(b) All waivers of an open-enrollment public
charter school under subdivision (12)(C)(ii)(a) of this section be in effect
until the end of the 2027-2028 school year or the end of the charter term,
whichever occurs first; or
(iii)(a) Received a letter grade of "A" or "B" under
the school rating system under § 6-15-2101 et seq. for the 2022-2023 school
year.
(b) All waivers of an open-enrollment public
charter school under subdivision (12)(C)(iii)(a) of this section be in effect
until the end of the 2028-2029 school year or the end of the charter term,
whichever occurs first.
(D) An open-enrollment public charter school approved by
the charter authorizing panel and the State Board of Education to operate as
a virtual charter school shall be granted a waiver of requirements in law or
rule applicable to the physical presence of students on a school campus as
designated by the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education upon
approval of an initial application to establish a virtual charter school or a
renewal of an existing virtual charter school;
(10)(13) “Parent” means any parent, legal guardian, person
standing in loco parentis, or other person having custody or charge of a
school-age child;
(11)(14) “Public charter school” means a conversion public
charter school or an open-enrollment public charter school; and
(12)(15) “Public school” means a school that is part of a public
school district under the control and management of a local school district
board of directors.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 6-23-104 is amended to read as follows:
04-07-2025 10:31:54 TNL093

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/7/25 HB1672
6-23-104. Charter form for public charter schools — Requirements —
Revision.
(a) A charter for a public charter school shall:
(1) Be in the form of a written contract signed by the
Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education and the chief operating
officer of the public charter school an authorized member of the charter
school board;
(2) Satisfy the requirements of this chapter; and
(3) Ensure that the information required under § 6-23-404 is
consistent with the information provided in the application and any
modification that the authorizer may require.
(b) Any A revision or amendment of the charter for a public charter
school may be made only with the approval of the authorizer.
(c) An open-enrollment A public charter school shall post the most
recent version of the written contract its charter on the website of the
open-enrollment public charter school by August 1 each year.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 6-23-105(a)(2), concerning modification of
a public charter school's charter, is amended to read as follows:
(2) The authorizer may allow approve the voluntary assignment of
a public charter school to another charter school board upon petition by the
public charter school boards to the authorizer.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 6-23-105(a)(3), concerning the transfer or
assignment of a public charter school charter to an eligible entity, is
amended to read as follows:
(3)(A) If the authorizer transfers or assigns the charter of a
public charter school to an eligible entity a different charter school board,
the authorizer shall not hold the applicant charter school board in receipt
of of the charter responsible for any activity that occurred before the
transfer or assignment, which includes without limitation any disciplinary
action taken by the authorizer.
(B) After the authorizer transfers or assigns a charter to
an eligible entity a different charter school board, the authorizer shall:
(i) Issue a new local education agency number as
required under § 25-6-107; and
04-07-2025 10:31:54 TNL093

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/7/25 HB1672
(ii) Not issue an annual report as required under §
6-15-2101 until the eligible entity to which the charter was transferred has
completed at least one (1) school year.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 6-23-105(d), concerning a procedure used to
place a public charter school on probation or modifying, revoking,
transferring, assigning, or denying renewal of a charter, is amended to read
as follows:
(d)(1) The procedure adopted under subsection (c) of this section
shall provide an opportunity for a hearing to the persons operating the
public charter school.
(2)(A) The hearing shall be held at the Division of Elementary
and Secondary Education.
(B) The authorizer shall provide sufficient written notice
of the time and location of the hearing.
(3) There is no further right of appeal beyond the determination
of the authorizer.
(4)(3) The Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et
seq., shall not apply to a hearing concerning a public charter school.
(4)(A) If a public charter school receives an "F" letter grade
for three (3) consecutive school years, then the public charter school's
charter shall be revoked.
(B)(i) Within ten (10) days following the notification by
the division to a public charter school of its receipt of an "F" letter grade
for the third consecutive school year and revocation of the public charter
school's charter, the public charter school may request a hearing before the
State Board of Education to request reinstatement of the charter.
(ii) The state board shall promulgate rules
governing the process for submitting a request and the hearing procedures
under subdivision (d)(4)(A) of this section.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 6-23-105(e)(1), concerning actions an
open-enrollment public charter school must take upon the revocation,
transfer, or assignment of its charter, is amended to read as follows:
(e)(1)(A) Immediately upon the revocation, transfer, or assignment of
an open-enrollment a charter by the authorizer, an open-enrollment public
04-07-2025 10:31:54 TNL093

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/7/25 HB1672
charter school shall:
(i) Provide to the division a detailed accounting of
all accounts payable due from the state funds held by the open-enrollment
public charter school and any additional information or records requested by
the division concerning the disbursement of the state funds;
(ii) Provide the division with a comprehensive list
of all banking information and accounts in which the open-enrollment public
charter school holds state or federal funds;
(iii) Receive prior approval from the division for
an expenditure over five hundred dollars ($500); and
(iv) Work in coordination with the division to draft
and implement a charter closure plan.
(B)(i) Immediately upon the State Board of Education's
affirmation of a authorizer's revocation, assignment, or transfer of an open-
enrollment public charter school's charter, the open-enrollment public
charter school shall transfer all state and federal funds held by the open-
enrollment public charter school to the division.
(ii) The division shall hold:
(a) Hold funds received under subdivision
(e)(1)(B)(i) of this section in receivership in a separate fund; and shall
expend
(b) Expend the funds received under
subdivision (e)(1)(B)(i) of this section only with prior approval of the
Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 6-23-107 is amended to read as follows:
6-23-107. Reporting requirements.
(a) Within ten (10) calendar days of the close of the first quarter of
each school year, a A public charter school shall submit a written report, as
prescribed in its charter and performance framework, to the Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education authorizer in the format required by the
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education that contains the following
information for the current school year without limitation:
(1) The number of applications for enrollment received
Enrollment data;
(2) The number of applicants with a disability identified under
04-07-2025 10:31:54 TNL093

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/7/25 HB1672
the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq. The
number of applications for enrollment received; and
(3) The number of applications for enrollment the public charter
school denied and an explanation of the reason for each denial accepted;
(4) The student subpopulation data;
(5) Retention data;
(6) Attrition data;
(7) Disciplinary actions taken against enrolled students; and
(8) Student assessment scores.
(b) Within ten (10) calendar days of the close of the fourth quarter
of each school year, a public charter school shall submit a written report to
the division that contains the following information for the current school
year:
(1) The number of students in each of the following categories:
(A) Students who dropped out of the public charter school
during the school year;
(B) Students who were expelled during the school year by
the public charter school; and
(C) Students who were enrolled in the public charter
school but for a reason other than those cited in subdivisions (b)(1)(A) and
(B) of this section did not complete the school year at the public charter
school; and
(2)(A) For all students enrolled in the public charter school,
the scores for assessments required under the Arkansas Educational Support
and Accountability Act, § 6-15-2901 et seq.
(B) If there is any discrepancy in the number of students
for whom scores are reported under this subdivision (b)(2) and the number of
students enrolled at the beginning of the school year, the public charter
school shall explain in the report the reason for the discrepancy.
(c)(b) The division shall not exempt a public charter school from the
reporting required under this section.
(d) The division shall publish a copy of each report on the division's
website.
(e)(c) If a public charter school fails to comply with this section,
the division shall note the failure in the annual evaluation of the public
charter school.
04-07-2025 10:31:54 TNL093

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/7/25 HB1672

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 6-23-201 is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) Any public school district may apply to the authorizer for
conversion public charter school status for a public school in the public
school district in accordance with a schedule approved by the authorizer
using the application developed by the Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education.
(2) A public school district's application for conversion public
charter school status for the public school may include, but shall not be
limited to, the following purposes:
(A) Adopting research-based school or instructional
designs, or both, that focus on improving student and school performance,
which may include without limitation the implementation of a community school
plan, as defined by § 6-15-3002;
(B) Addressing school improvement status resulting from
sanctions listed in § 6-15-207(c)(8) and § 6-15-429(a) and (b) [repealed]; or
(C) Partnering with other public school districts or
public schools to address students' needs in a geographical location or
multiple locations.
(b) Such application shall:
(1)(A) Describe the results of a public hearing called by the
local school district board of directors for the purpose of assessing support
of an application for conversion public charter school status.
(B) Notice of the public hearing shall be:
(i) Distributed to the community, licensed
personnel, and the parents of all students enrolled at the public school for
which the public school district initiated the application; and
(ii) Published in a newspaper having general
circulation in the public school district at least three (3) weeks before the
date of the meeting;
(2) Describe a plan for school improvement that addresses how
the conversion public charter school will improve student learning and meet
the state education goals;
(3) Outline proposed performance criteria that will be used
during the initial five-year period of the charter to measure the progress of
the conversion public charter school in improving student learning and
04-07-2025 10:31:54 TNL093

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/7/25 HB1672
meeting or exceeding the state education goals;
(4) Describe how the licensed employees and parents of students
to be enrolled in the conversion public charter school will be involved in
developing and implementing the school improvement plan and identifying
performance criteria;
(5) Describe how the concerns of licensed employees and parents
of students enrolled in the conversion public charter school will be
solicited and addressed in evaluating the effectiveness of the improvement
plan; and
(6) List the specific provisions of this title and the specific
rules promulgated by the State Board of Education from which the conversion
public charter school will be exempt.
(c)(1) A licensed teacher employed by a public school in the school
year immediately preceding the effective date of a charter for a public
school conversion within that public school district may not be transferred
to or be employed by the conversion public charter school over the licensed
teacher's objection, nor shall that objection be used as a basis to deny
continuing employment within the public school district in another public
school at a similar grade level.
(2) If the transfer of a teacher within the public school
district is not possible because only one (1) public school exists for that
teacher's licensure level, then the local school district board of directors
shall call for a vote of the licensed teachers in the proposed conversion
public charter school site and proceed, at the option of the local school
board of directors, with the conversion public charter school application if
a majority of the licensed teachers approve the proposal.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 6-23-202 is amended to read as follows:
6-23-202. Authorization for conversion public charter school status.
As requested by the Upon request of a conversion public charter school
applicant, the authorizer shall review the application for conversion public
charter school status and may approve any or deny an application that:
(1) Provides a plan for improvement at the school level for
improving student learning and for meeting or exceeding the state education
goals;
(2) Includes a set of performance-based objectives and student
04-07-2025 10:31:54 TNL093

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/7/25 HB1672
achievement objectives for the term of the charter and the means for
measuring those objectives on at least a yearly basis;
(3) Includes a proposal to directly and substantially involve
the parents of students to be enrolled in the conversion public charter
school, as well as the licensed employees and the broader community, in the
process of carrying out the terms of the charter; and
(4) Includes an agreement to provide a yearly report to parents,
the community, the local school district board of directors, and the
authorizer that indicates the progress made by the conversion public charter
school in meeting the performance objectives during the previous year.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 6-23-301 is amended to read as follows:
6-23-301. Application forms and procedures for open-enrollment public
charter schools.
(a) The authorizer shall adopt:
(1) An application form, a schedule, and a procedure that must
be used to apply for a charter for an open-enrollment public charter school;
and
(2) Criteria to use in selecting a program for which a charter
may be granted.
(b) The application form must provide space for including all
information required under this chapter to be contained in the charter.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 6-23-302(c), concerning an application to
become an open-enrollment public charter school, is amended to read as
follows:
(c) The application under this section shall:
(1)(A) Describe the results of a public hearing called by the
applicant for the purpose of assessing support for an application for an
open-enrollment public charter school.
(B)(i) Notice of the public hearing shall be published one
(1) time a week for three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper having general
circulation in the public school district in which the open-enrollment public
charter school is likely to be located.
(ii) The last publication of notice shall be no less
than seven (7) days before the public meeting.
04-07-2025 10:31:54 TNL093

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/7/25 HB1672
(iii) The notice shall not be published in the
classified or legal notice section of the newspaper.
(C)(i) Within seven (7) calendar days following the first
publication of notice required under subdivision (c)(1)(B) of this section,
letters announcing the public hearing shall be sent to the superintendent of
each of the public school districts from which the open-enrollment public
charter school is likely to draw students for the purpose of enrollment and
the superintendent of any public school district that is contiguous to the
public school district in which the open-enrollment public charter school
will be located.
(ii) An affected school district may submit written
comments concerning the application to the authorizer to be considered at the
time of the authorizer's review of the application;
(2) Describe a plan for academic achievement that addresses how
the open-enrollment public charter school will improve student learning and
meet or exceed the state education goals, which may include without
limitation the implementation of a community school plan, as defined by § 6-
15-3002;
(3) Outline the proposed performance criteria that will be used
during the initial five-year period of the open-enrollment public charter
school operation to measure its progress in improving student learning and
meeting or exceeding the state education goals;
(4) List the specific provisions of this title and the specific
rules promulgated by the State Board of Education from which the open-
enrollment public charter school seeks to be exempted;
(5)(A) Describe in general terms the area within the boundaries
of the school district where the applicant intends to obtain a facility to be
used for the open-enrollment public charter school.
(B) If the facility to be used for an open-enrollment
public charter school is a public school district facility, the open-
enrollment public charter school must shall operate in the facility in
accordance with the terms established by the local school district board of
directors of the public school district in an agreement governing the
relationship between the open-enrollment public charter school and the public
school district.
(C) If the facility that will be used for the open-
04-07-2025 10:31:54 TNL093

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/7/25 HB1672
enrollment public charter school is owned by or leased from a sectarian
organization, the terms of the facility agreement must shall be disclosed to
the authorizer; and
(6) Include a detailed budget and a governance plan for the
operation of the open-enrollment public charter school.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 6-23-303 is amended to read as follows:
6-23-303. Authorization for an open-enrollment public charter school.
As requested by the Upon request of an applicant for an open-enrollment
public charter school, the authorizer shall review the application for an
open-enrollment public charter school and may approve any application that:
(1) Provides a plan for academic achievement that addresses how
the open-enrollment public charter school proposes to improve student
learning and meet or exceed the state education goals;
(2) Includes a set of performance criteria that will be used
during the initial five-year period of the open-enrollment public charter
school's operation to measure its progress in meeting its academic,
financial, and operational performance goals;
(3) Includes a proposal to directly and substantially involve
the parents of students to be enrolled in the open-enrollment public charter
school, the licensed employees, and the broader community in carrying out the
terms of the open-enrollment charter;
(4) Includes an agreement to provide an annual report to
parents, the community, and the authorizer that demonstrates the progress
made by the open-enrollment public charter school during the previous
academic year in meeting its academic, financial, and operational performance
objectives goals;
(5) Includes a detailed budget, a business plan, and a
governance plan for the operation of the open-enrollment public charter
school; and
(6) Establishes the eligible entity's application status as a
tax-exempt organization under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986 before the first day of its operation with students.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 6-23-304(a), concerning approval or denial
of an application for an open-enrollment public charter school, is amended to
04-07-2025 10:31:54 TNL093

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/7/25 HB1672
read as follows:
(a) The authorizer may approve or deny an application based on:
(1) Criteria provided by law or by rule adopted by the State
Board of Education; and
(2) Findings of the authorizer relating to improving student
performance and encouraging innovative programs; and
(3) Written findings or statements received by the authorizer
from any public school district likely to be affected by the open-enrollment
public charter school.

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 6-23-304(c) and (d), concerning the number
of campuses an open-enrollment public charter school may opeen and operate,
is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) An open-enrollment public charter school applicant's school
school's campus shall be limited to a single open-enrollment public charter
school per charter except as allowed in subsection (d) of this section.
(2) A private or parochial elementary or secondary school shall
not be eligible for open-enrollment public charter school status.
(d) A charter applicant that receives an approved open-enrollment
public charter may petition the authorizer for additional licenses to
establish an open-enrollment public charter school in any of the various
congressional districts approval to open and operate additional campuses in
Arkansas if the applicant meets the following conditions:
(1) The approved open-enrollment public charter applicant school
is meeting the terms and performance criteria of its charter and has
demonstrated academic success as defined by the state board for all public
schools;
(2) The approved open-enrollment public charter applicant has
not:
(A) Been subject to any disciplinary action by the
authorizer;
(B) Been classified as in need of Level 5 — Intensive
support or fiscal distress found to exhibit academic, fiscal, or
organizational deficiencies; and
(C) Had its open-enrollment public charter placed on
charter school probation or suspended or revoked under § 6-23-105; and
04-07-2025 10:31:54 TNL093

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/7/25 HB1672
(3) The authorizer determines in writing by majority of a quorum
present that the approved open-enrollment public charter applicant has
generally established the educational program results and criteria set forth
in this subsection.

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 6-23-307 is amended to read as follows:
6-23-307. Renewal of charter.
(a)(1) After the initial five-year period of an open-enrollment public
charter, the authorizer may renew the open-enrollment public charter on a
one-year or multiyear basis, not to exceed twenty (20) years.
(2) A renewal decision shall be based on the academic,
financial, and operational performance of a charter school over the term of a
charter contract.
(b) The State Board of Education Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education shall create an expedited renewal process for open-enrollment
public charter schools that meet certain criteria that includes the following
without limitation:
(1) A school rating that is above the state average based on the
most recent results of the Arkansas school rating system established under §§
6-15-2105 and 6-15-2106 and state board State Board of Education rules;
(2) Demonstration of exceptional academic growth with enrolled
students, as defined by the state board; and
(3) Adherence to all operational and financial requirements, as
defined by the state board; and
(4) Demonstration of operational viability and financial
sustainability as evidenced by performance indicators.

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 6-23-401(b)(1), concerning rules and
restrictions imposed on open-enrollment public charter schools, is amended to
read as follows:
(b) An open-enrollment public charter school is subject to any
prohibition, restriction, or requirement imposed by this title and any rule
promulgated by the State Board of Education under this title relating to:
(1) Monitoring compliance with this chapter, as determined by
the commissioner authorizer;
(2) Public school accountability under this title;
04-07-2025 10:31:54 TNL093

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/7/25 HB1672
(3) High school graduation requirements as established by the
state board;
(4) Special education programs as provided by this title;
(5) Conducting criminal background checks for employees as
provided in this title;
(6) Health and safety codes as established by the state board
and local governmental entities; and
(7) Reporting through the Arkansas Public School Computer
Network applications as provided under this title.

SECTION 21. Arkansas Code § 6-23-402 is amended to read as follows:
6-23-402. Enrollment numbers and deadline.
(a) An open-enrollment public charter school may enroll a number of
students not to exceed the number of students specified in its charter.
(b)(1) Any student enrolling in an open-enrollment public charter
school shall enroll in that school by July 30 for the upcoming school year
during which the student will be attending the open-enrollment public charter
school.
(2) However, if a student enrolled by July 15 should no longer
choose to attend the open-enrollment public charter school or if the open-
enrollment public charter school has not yet met its enrollment cap, the
open-enrollment public charter school may enroll a number of replacement or
additional students not to exceed the enrollment cap of the open-enrollment
public charter school.
(3) An open-enrollment public charter school shall have a policy
concerning whether the open-enrollment public charter school will enroll
students after July 30.
(c)(b) Open-enrollment public charter schools shall keep records of
attendance in accordance with the law and submit quarterly attendance reports
to the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education.

SECTION 22. Arkansas Code § 6-23-404 is amended to read as follows:
6-23-404. Evaluation of open-enrollment public charter schools.
(a) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall cause to
be conducted conduct an annual evaluation of open-enrollment public charter
schools.
04-07-2025 10:31:54 TNL093

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/7/25 HB1672
(b) An annual evaluation shall include without limitation
consideration of: be based on a review of the criteria that is specified in
the public charter school's charter and the public charter school's letter
grade, in accordance with applicable rules.
(1) Student scores under the statewide assessment program
described in § 6-15-433 [repealed];
(2) Student attendance;
(3) Student grades;
(4) Incidents involving student discipline;
(5) Socioeconomic data on students' families;
(6) Parental satisfaction with the schools;
(7) Student satisfaction with the schools; and
(8) The open-enrollment public charter school's compliance with
§ 6-23-107.
(c) The authorizer may require the a charter holder to appear before
the authorizer to discuss the results of the annual evaluation and to present
further information to the authorizer as the authorizer deems necessary.

SECTION 23. Arkansas Code § 6-23-405 is amended to read as follows:
6-23-405. Monthly reports Initial year monitoring.
An open-enrollment public charter school in its initial school year of
operation shall provide monthly reports on its enrollment status and
compliance with its approved budget for the current school year to the The
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall monitor open-enrollment
public charter schools with regard to student enrollment and budgetary
compliance.

SECTION 24. Arkansas Code § 6-23-406 is repealed.
6-23-406. Division of Elementary and Secondary Education review.
The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall:
(1) Conduct an end-of-semester review of each open-enrollment
public charter school that is in its initial school year of operation at the
end of the first semester and at the end of the school year; and
(2) Report to the State Board of Education and the Commissioner
of Elementary and Secondary Education on the open-enrollment public charter
school's:
04-07-2025 10:31:54 TNL093

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/7/25 HB1672
(A) Overall financial condition; and
(B) Overall condition of student enrollment.

SECTION 25. Arkansas Code § 6-23-701(b) and (c), concerning the
charter authorizing panel, are amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) The division shall exercise authority over public charter
schools under this chapter through a public by recommending to a charter
authorizing panel established within the division that the charter
authorizing panel take actions authorized under subsection (a) of this
section.
(2)(A) The Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education
shall appoint a public charter authorizing panel the members of the charter
authorizing panel that may consist of individuals from outside the division
as well as professional staff employed at the division to serve at the
pleasure of the commissioner.
(B) The commissioner may elect to serve as a member on the
public charter authorizing panel as the chair Members of the charter
authorizing panel may be:
(i) Individuals from outside the division;
(ii) Professional staff employed by the division; or
(iii) The commissioner.
(3) The public charter authorizing panel charter authorizing
panel shall be composed of an odd number of members and shall consist of no
less than five (5) members and no more than eleven (11) members:
(A) Seven (7) members; and
(D) A simple majority of members from outside the
Department of Education.
(c) The Upon approval of the division, the charter authorizing panel:
(1) Shall review applications to establish, renew, modify,
revoke, transfer, or assign a new or existing public charter and make a
recommendation to the State Board of Education for a final decision; and may
(2) May recommend to the State Board of Education that it waive
provisions of this title or State Board of Education and state board rules as
allowed by law for public charters.

SECTION 26. Arkansas Code § 6-23-701(e), concerning the primary
04-07-2025 10:31:54 TNL093

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/7/25 HB1672
authorizer of public charters, is amended to read as follows:
(e) The division shall be the primary authorizer of public charters
except as provided under § 6-23-703 state board may promulgate rules as
necessary to administer this subchapter.

SECTION 27. Arkansas Code § 6-23-703 is amended to read as follows:
6-23-703. State Board of Education optional review.
(a) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall notify in
writing the State Board of Education of all recommendations made by the
charter authorizing panel before the next regularly scheduled state board
meeting after a recommendation is made by the charter authorizing panel.
(b)(1) At its next meeting following notification by the division
under subsection (a) of this section, the state board shall vote to accept or
reject each recommendation made by the charter authorizing panel.
(2) If the state board votes to reject a recommendation made by
the charter authorizing panel, the state board shall:
(A) Provide the specific reasons for its rejection and any
additional information used as the basis for its rejection; and
(B)(i) Conduct a hearing at the earlier date of the next
regularly scheduled state board meeting or a special state board meeting.
(ii) At the conclusion of a hearing under
subdivision (b)(2)(B)(i) of this section, the state board shall issue a final
decision regarding a public charter school or an application to become a
public charter school under this subchapter.
(c) A public charter school or an applicant to become a public charter
school may appeal a recommendation of the charter authorizing panel to the
state board by filing a written notice of appeal with the Secretary of the
Department of Education within fifteen (15) calendar days of the charter
authorizing panel's recommendation.
(2) Conduct a full hearing regarding a final decision by the
division under § 6-23-701(a); and
(3) Hold the hearing at the earlier of:
(A) The next regularly scheduled state board meeting
following the state board meeting during which the state board voted to
authorize a review; or
(B) A special board meeting called by the state board.
04-07-2025 10:31:54 TNL093

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/7/25 HB1672
(c)(1) At the conclusion of the hearing, the state board may issue a
final decision by state board vote.
(2) The state board may decide by majority vote of the quorum
to:
(A) Affirm the decision of the division;
(B) Take other lawful action on the public charter; or
(C)(i) Request additional information from the division,
public charter school, public charter school applicant, or affected school
district, if needed.
(ii) If the state board requests additional
information under subdivision (c)(2)(C)(i) of this section, the state board
shall hold a subsequent hearing at the earlier of:
(a) The next regularly scheduled state board
meeting; or
(b) A special board meeting called by the
state board.
(3) A decision made by the state board is final with no right of
appeal.
(d) The state board may promulgate rules as necessary to implement
this section.
(a) A public charter school or an applicant to become a public charter
school may appeal any adverse ruling from the authorizer to the State Board
of Education.
(b)(1) If a public charter school or an applicant to become a public
charter school chooses to appeal an adverse ruling from the authorizer under
subsection (a) of this section, the public charter school or the applicant to
become a public charter school shall file a written notice of appeal with the
state board within fifteen (15) calendar days of the authorizer's adverse
ruling.
(2) A written notice of appeal filed with the state board under
subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall state the specific reasons
supporting a review by the state board.
(c)(1) Upon receipt of a notice of appeal under subdivision (b)(1) of
this section, the state board shall, upon a motion approved by a majority
vote, determine whether to hear or decline to hear an appeal.
(2) If the state board decides to hear an appeal, the hearing
04-07-2025 10:31:54 TNL093

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/7/25 HB1672
shall be conducted at the earlier of:
(A) The next regularly scheduled state board meeting; or
(B) A special meeting called by the state board for the
purpose of hearing the appeal.
(d) A decision by the state board under this section is final with no
further right to appeal.
(e) The state board may promulgate rules as necessary to implement
this section.

/s/McCollum


























04-07-2025 10:31:54 TNL093